Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB49.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of June 23, 1993 (P.L.128, No.29), known as the Plain Language Consumer Contract Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Consumer." Any individual who borrows, buys, leases or obtains credit, money, services or property under a consumer contract or form contract."Consumer contract" or "contract." A written agreement 123456789101112131415161718 between a consumer and a party acting in the usual course of business, made primarily for personal, family or household purposes in which a consumer does any of the following:(1) Borrows money.(2) Buys, leases or rents personal property, real property or services for cash or on credit.(3) Obtains credit."Form contract." A consumer contract with standardized terms used by a merchant acting in the course of selling or leasing the merchant's goods or services to a consumer without a meaningful opportunity for the consumer to negotiate the standardized terms. As used in this definition, terms in which the consumer selects from various standardized provisions offered by the merchant shall not be regarded as negotiated.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Standardized terms in form contracts.(a) Enforceability.--If a merchant presents a form contract to a consumer containing standardized terms that would materially alter the consumer's legal rights or obligations under the form contract, the standardized terms are not enforceable, regardless of whether the form contract would otherwise be construed as enforceable.(b) Materiality.--Whether a standardized term materially alters a form contract is to be decided by a court after consideration of all of the following factors:(1) Whether the standardized term would cause surprise or hardship for the consumer.(2) Whether the consumer was expressly aware of the standardized term.(3) Whether the consumer had reasonable notice of the 20250HB0049PN0039 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standardized term.(4) The nature of the merchant's business and its relationship with the consumer.(5) The extent to which all terms of the form contract, including the standardized term, were negotiable.(6) Whether adequate and reasonable consideration was provided for the standardized term by other terms within the form contract.(7) Any other reasonable factor brought to the attention of the court.(c) Rebuttable presumption.--The following carry a rebuttable presumption of materially altering a form contract:(1) a standardized term that would unreasonably restrict or waive a consumer's rights to the consumer's intellectual property;(2) standardized terms that limit the consumer's ownership of intellectual property reasonably assumed to be sold or licensed as part of the transaction;(3) standardized terms that limit the consumer's right to resell or transfer;(4) standardized terms that limit the merchant's or manufacturer's liability;(5) standardized terms that dictate a legal forum for dispute resolution;(6) standardized terms that require exclusive use of a product or service of the merchant;(7) standardized terms that require a subscription to a service;(8) standardized terms that prevent the transfer of warranties; or20250HB0049PN0039 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) standardized terms that require the consumer to exclusively use parts or repair services stipulated by the merchant or manufacturer.(d) Signature as evidence.--A consumer's signature, whether printed, typed or electronically signed, or by any other confirmation, shall not be regarded as evidence of awareness of a standardized term.(e) Applicability.--This section applies to all form contracts executed in this Commonwealth after the effective date of this subsection and regardless of whether the form contract is presented as part of an electronic or paper transaction, with the exception of a contract excluded by section 4(b).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0049PN0039 - 4 - 12345678910111213